sv: Provpresentation: Cabochon; Kluster; Sågad skiva; Fasetterad; Inramad; Geod (öppnad); Geod (oöppnad); I burk eller flaska; Monterad på stativ; På matris; Polerad; Rå (obehandlad); Tunnslip; Trumlad; Annat
pt-PT: Apresentação do espécime: Cabochão; Aglomerado; Placa cortada; Facetado; Expositor com moldura; Geodo (aberto); Geodo (fechado); Em frasco ou ampola; Montado em suporte; Na matriz; Polido; Bruto (não preparado); Secção fina; Rolado; Outro
lt-LT: Egzemplioriaus pateikimas: Kabašonas; Drūza; Pjauta plokštelė; Fasetuotas; Įrėmintas eksponatas; Geoda (atidaryta); Geoda (neatidaryta); Indelyje ar flakone; Pritvirtinta prie stovo; Ant matricos; Poliruotas; Neapdorotas; Plonas pjūvis; Būgnintas; Kita
it: Presentazione del campione: Cabochon; Agglomerato; Lastra tagliata; Sfaccettato; Espositore incorniciato; Geode (aperto); Geode (chiuso); In barattolo o fiala; Montato su supporto; Su matrice; Levigato; Grezzo (non preparato); Sezione sottile; Burattato; Altro
da: Præsentation af samlerobjekt: Cabochon; Klynge; Skåret plade; Facetteret; Indrammet udstilling; Geode (åbnet); Geode (uåbnet); I krukke eller hætteglas; Monteret på stativ; På matrix; Poleret; Rå (ubehandlet); Tyndt snit; Tromlet; Andet
pt-BR: Espécime apresentação: Cabochão; Drusa; Chapa cortada; Facetado; Quadro de exibição; Geodo (aberto); Geodo (fechado); Em frasco ou pote; Montado em suporte; Na matriz; Polido; Bruto (não preparado); Lâmina delgada; Rolado; Outros
hr-HR: Prezentacija uzorka: Kabošon; Klaster; Odrezana ploča; Fasetirano; Uokvireni prikaz; Geoda (otvorena); Geoda (neotvorena); U staklenci ili bočici; Montirano na stalak; Na matriksu; Polirano; Sirovo (nepripremljeno); Tanki presjek; Bubnjano; Ostalo
nb: Prøvepresentasjon: Kabochon; Klynge; Skåret plate; Fasettert; Innrammet utstilling; Geode (åpnet); Geode (uåpnet); I glass eller hetteglass; Montert på stativ; På matriks; Polert; Rå (upreparert); Tynnslip; Tromlet; Annet
es: Presentación de la muestra: Cabujón; Agrupación; Losa cortada; Facetado; Exhibidor enmarcado; Geoda (abierta); Geoda (cerrada); En frasco o vial; Montado en soporte; En matriz; Pulido; En bruto (sin preparación); Sección fina; Canto rodado; Otro
tr: Numune sunum şekli: Kabaşon; Küme; Kesilmiş dilim; Fasetalı; Çerçeveli sunum; Jeot (açık); Jeot (kapalı); Kavanoz veya şişede; Standa monte; Matris üzerinde; Cilalı; İşlenmemiş (hazırlanmamış); İnce kesit; Tamburlanmış; Diğer
th: การนำเสนอตัวอย่าง: หลังเบี้ย; คลัสเตอร์; ตัดแผ่น; เจียระไนเหลี่ยม; จัดแสดงในกรอบ; จีโอด (เปิด); จีโอด (ยังไม่เปิด); ในโหลหรือขวด; ตั้งบนฐาน; บนหินแม่; ขัดเงา; ดิบ (ยังไม่เตรียม); แผ่นตัดบาง; ขัดมัน; อื่นๆ
de: Präsentationsform des Exponats: Cabochon; Cluster; Geschnittene Scheibe; Facettiert; Gerahmt; Geode (geöffnet); Geode (ungeöffnet); Im Glas oder Fläschchen; Auf Ständer montiert; Auf Matrix; Poliert; Roh (unpräpariert); Dünnschliff; Getrommelt; Sonstige
fi: Näytteen esittely: Pyöröhiottu; Klusteri; Leikattu laatta; Viistehiottu; Kehystetty näyttö; Geodi (avattu); Geodi (avaamaton); Purkissa tai pullossa; Telineeseen asennettu; Matriisissa; Kiillotettu; Raaka (käsittelemätön); Ohuthie; Rumpuhiottu; Muu
sl-SI: Predstavitev primerka: Kabošon; Grozd; Rezana plošča; Fasetiran; V okvirju; Geoda (odprta); Geoda (neodprta); V kozarčku ali fioli; Na stojalu; Na matriki; Poliran; Surovo (neobdelano); Tanek presek; Bobnan (valjan); Drugo
fr: Présentation du spécimen: Cabochon; Agrégat; Tranche; Facetté; Présentation encadrée; Géode (ouverte); Géode (fermée); En pot ou fiole; Monté sur socle; Sur matrice; Poli; Brut (non préparé); Lame mince; Roulé; Autre
vi: Trình bày mẫu vật: Cabochon; Cụm; Tấm cắt; Cắt giác; Trưng bày trong khung; Hốc tinh thể (đã mở); Hốc tinh thể (chưa mở); Trong lọ hoặc ống nhỏ; Gắn trên giá đỡ; Trên đá mẹ; Đánh bóng; Thô (chưa xử lý); Lát cắt mỏng; Được mài nhẵn; Khác
ro-RO: Mod de prezentare a specimenului: Cabochon; Grup; Placă tăiată; Fațetat; Afișaj înrămat; Geodă (deschisă); Geodă (închisă); În borcan sau flacon; Montat pe suport; Pe matrice; Șlefuit; Brut (neprelucrat); Secțiune subțire; Rulat; Altele
zh-CN: 标本展示: 凸圆面; 晶簇; 切割切片; 刻面; 镶框展示; 晶洞（已切开）; 晶洞（未切开）; 瓶装或管装; 安装在支架上; 附着围岩; 抛光; 原石（未处理）; 薄片; 滚石抛光; 其他
bg-BG: Представяне на образеца: Кабошон; Клъстер; Отрязана плоча; Фасетиран; В рамка; Жеода (отворена); Жеода (неотворена); В буркан или флакон; Монтиран на стойка; На матрица; Полиран; Суров (необработен); Тънък разрез; Галтован; Друго
el: Παρουσίαση δείγματος: Καμποσόν; Σύμπλεγμα; Κομμένη πλάκα; Με έδρες; Προθήκη με κορνίζα; Γεώδης (ανοιχτός); Γεώδης (κλειστός); Σε βάζο ή φιαλίδιο; Τοποθετημένο σε βάση; Σε μήτρα; Γυαλισμένο; Ακατέργαστο (χωρίς προετοιμασία); Λεπτή τομή; Λειασμένο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Prezentácia vzorky: Kabošon; Zhluk; Plát; Fasetované; Zarámované; Geóda (otvorená); Geóda (neotvorená); V nádobe alebo liekovke; Namontované na stojane; V materskej hornine; Leštené; Surové (neopracované); Tenký výbrus; Tamblované; Iné
ja: 標本提示: カボション; クラスター; カットスラブ; ファセット; 額装ディスプレイ; ジオード (開); ジオード (未開); 瓶または小瓶入り; スタンドマウント; 母岩付き; 研磨済み; 原石 (未加工); 薄片; タンブル; その他
hu: Minta bemutatása: Kaboson; Kristályhalmaz; Vágott lemez; Fazettázott; Keretes bemutató; Geóda (nyitott); Geóda (zárt); Üvegcsében vagy fiolában; Állványra szerelt; Mátrixon; Csiszolt; Nyers (előkészítetlen); Vékonycsiszolat; Koptatott; Egyéb
cs: Prezentace vzorku: Kabošon; Drúza; Uříznutý plátek; Fasetovaný; V rámečku; Geoda (otevřená); Geoda (neotevřená); V nádobce nebo lahvičce; Na podstavci; Na matrici; Leštěný; Surový (neopracovaný); Výbrus; Tromlovaný; Jiné
ru: Форма представления образца: Кабошон; Друза; Спил; Ограненный; В рамке; Жеода (открытая); Жеода (закрытая); В банке или флаконе; На подставке; На породе; Полированный; Необработанный; Шлиф; Галтованный; Другое
en: Specimen presentation: Cabochon; Cluster; Cut slab; Faceted; Framed display; Geode (opened); Geode (unopened); In jar or vial; Mounted on stand; On matrix; Polished; Raw (unprepared); Thin section; Tumbled; Other
ko: 표본 제시 방식: 카보숑; 클러스터; 절단 슬래브; 패싯; 프레임 디스플레이; 정동(열림); 정동(닫힘); 병 또는 바이알; 스탠드 장착형; 모암 부착형; 연마형; 원석(미가공); 박편; 텀블; 기타
pl: Sposób prezentacji próbki: Kaboszon; Skupienie; Cięty plaster; Fasetowany; Ekspozycja w ramce; Geoda (otwarta); Geoda (zamknięta); W słoiczku lub fiolce; Zamontowany na podstawce; Na skale macierzystej; Polerowany; Surowy (niepreparowany); Szlif płytkowy; Bębnowany; Inne
zh-TW: 標本呈現方式: 凸圓面; 晶簇; 切片; 刻面; 裱框展示; 晶洞 (已開); 晶洞 (未開); 裝於罐或小瓶中; 安裝於支架; 帶圍岩; 拋光; 原石 (未處理); 薄片; 滾石; 其他
nl: Specimen presentatie: Cabochon; Cluster; Gesneden plak; Gefacetteerd; Ingelijste weergave; Geode (geopend); Geode (ongeopend); In potje of flesje; Gemonteerd op standaard; Op matrix; Gepolijst; Ruw (onbewerkt); Dunne doorsnede; Getrommeld; Overige